Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-209
Baitfish, defined.

Baitfish means those species of fish, as listed in rules and regulations of the commission, that are collected from the wild or bought from legal sources and sold for use as bait.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 19;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 4.